Utah statutes.
67-1-2.5.   Data bases for executive boards.
(1)  As used in this section, "executive board" means any executive branch
board, commission, council, committee, working group, task force, study group,
advisory group, or other body with a defined limited membership that is
created to operate for more than six months by the constitution, by statute,
by executive order, by the governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general,
state auditor, or state treasurer or by the head of a department, division, or
other administrative subunit of the executive branch of state government.
(2)  The governor shall designate a person from his staff to maintain a
computerized data base containing information about all executive boards.
(3)  The person designated to maintain the data base shall ensure that the
data base contains:
(a)  the name of each executive board;
(b)  the statutory or constitutional authority for the creation of the
executive board;
(c)  the sunset date on which each executive board's statutory authority
expires;
(d)  the state officer or department and division of state government under
whose jurisdiction the executive board operates or with which the executive
board is affiliated, if any;
(e)  the name, address, gender, telephone number, and county of each person
currently serving on the executive board, along with a notation of all vacant
or unfilled positions;
(f)  the title of the position held by the person who appointed each member of
the executive board;
(g)  the length of the term to which each member of the executive board was
appointed and the month and year that each executive board member's term
expires;
(h)  whether or not members appointed to the executive board require consent
of the Senate;
(i)  the organization, interest group, profession, local government entity, or
geographic area that the person represents, if any;
(j)  the person's party affiliation, if the statute or executive order
creating the position requires representation from political parties;
(k)  whether the executive board is a policy board or an advisory board;
(l)  whether or not the executive board has or exercises rulemaking authority;
and
(m)  any compensation and expense reimbursement that members of the executive
board are authorized to receive.
(4)  The person designated to maintain the data base shall:
(a)  make the information contained in the data base available to the public
upon request; and
(b)  cooperate with other entities of state government to publish the data or
useful summaries of the data.
(5) (a)  The person designated to maintain the data base shall prepare,
publish, and distribute an annual report by December 1 of each year that
includes, as of November 1 of that year:
(i)  the total number of executive boards;
(ii)  the name of each of those executive boards and the state officer or
department and division of state government under whose jurisdiction the
executive board operates or with which the executive board is affiliated, if
any;
(iii)  for each state officer and each department and division, the total
number of executive boards under the jurisdiction of or affiliated with that
officer, department, and division;
(iv)  the total number of members for each of those executive boards;
(v)  whether or not some or all of the members of each of those executive
boards are approved by the Senate;
(vi)  whether each board is a policymaking board or an advisory board and the
total number of policy boards and the total number of advisory boards; and
(vii)  the compensation, if any, paid to the members of each of those
executive boards.
(b)  The person designated to maintain the data bases shall distribute copies
of the report to:
(i)  the governor;
(ii)  the president of the Senate;
(iii)  the speaker of the House;
(iv)  the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel; and
(v)  any other persons who request a copy of the annual report.
